North Carolina, session 2025, SB1067.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Town of Ayden for
stormwater management projects intended to mitigate flooding hazard in the Kennedy Estates
subdivision of the Town.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S1067-v-1*